Louisiana, session 2026, HB670.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. Part IV of Chapter 3 of Title 51 of the Louisiana Revised Statutes of 1950,
comprised of R.S. 51:955.1 and 955.2, is hereby enacted to read as follows:
PART IV. LOUISIANA WOOD PELLET MANUFACTURING STRENGTHENING
ACT
§955.1. Findings; purpose
A. The legislature hereby finds and declares that the wood pellet and wood
derived fuel manufacturing industries represent a significant economic opportunity
for this state, leveraging this state's abundant forest resources, world-class deepwater
port facilities, and extensive rail network to serve growing international demand for
renewable biomass fuel. Wood pellet and wood derived fuels manufacturing creates
high-quality jobs in rural communities, supports the forestry sector, and diversifies
this state's economy. The legislature further finds that the current regulatory
framework, while serving important environmental and public safety purposes, was
not designed with the specific characteristics of these industries in mind and may
Page 1 of 3
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 670 ENROLLED
impose unnecessary burdens at a time when international demand, particularly from
European power generators and fuel users seeking alternative sources of fuel, is
growing.
B. It is the purpose of this Act to establish this state as a premier location for
wood pellet and wood derived fuels manufacturing by streamlining permitting
processes while maintaining appropriate environmental safeguards, developing a
skilled workforce to meet the industry's employment needs, and facilitating the
efficient transportation and export of wood pellets and wood derived fuels through
this state's port facilities, thereby enabling this state to capture a significant share of
the growing international market, create jobs, support rural communities, and
strengthen this state's economy.
§955.2. Wood pellet manufacturing; definitions; priority industry; port access
A. As used in this Part, "wood pellet manufacturing" means the production
of compressed biomass pellets from forestry, biomass, including but not limited to
forest and agriculture residues, thinnings, and storm damaged residues for export or
domestic use, including those supplying fuel markets driven by new and
transformative sources of power generation. As used in this Part, "wood derived
biofuel" means the production of fuels from forestry residues for export or domestic
use, and the associated handling and processing of forestry residues as may be
required in the production of fuel.
B. Louisiana Economic Development may support the recruitment, retention,
and expansion of wood pellet manufacturing facilities in this state within existing
statutory authority and subject to the availability of funds, and in accordance with
the Administrative Procedure Act, may develop policies, guidance, or program
criteria consistent with existing economic development programs, when appropriate
and within existing authority, including but not limited to the following:
(1) Prioritizing and enhancing job creation incentives for wood pellet and
wood derived fuel manufacturing facilities.
(2) Establishing workforce development and training initiatives for wood
pellet manufacturing facilities.
Page 2 of 3
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 670 ENROLLED
(3) Coordinating with ports regarding infrastructure needs associated with
wood pellet manufacturing cargo.
(4) Establishing site readiness criteria for wood pellet and wood derived fuel
manufacturing.
(5) Providing clear regulatory pathways for the development of wood pellet
manufacturing facilities throughout this state.
(6) Prioritizing wood pellet and wood derived fuel cargo for loading,
docking, and processing at state ports.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 3 of 3
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.